Colorado, session 2026A, SB098.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-12-103, amend
(11) as follows:
25-12-103. Maximum permissible noise levels.
(11) (a) This article is not applicable to the use of property by this
state, any political subdivision of this state, or any other entity not
organized for profit, including, but not limited to, nonprofit corporations,
or any of their lessees, licensees, or permittees, for the purpose of
promoting, producing, or holding cultural, entertainment, athletic, or
patriotic events, including, but not limited to, concerts, music festivals,
and fireworks displays. This subsection (11) shall not be construed to
preempt or limit the authority of any political subdivision having
jurisdiction to regulate noise abatement. THIS ARTICLE 12 DOES NOT
APPLY TO:
(I) THE USE OF PROPERTY THAT IS OWNED OR CONTROLLED BY THE
STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE;
(II) THE USE OF PROPERTY PURSUANT TO A PERMIT OR LICENSE
ISSUED BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT ADDRESSES SOUND EMITTED,
INCLUDING SOUND LEVELS AND HOURS, FROM THE PROPERTY, WHICH
-2- 098

PERMIT OR LICENSE MAY BE MORE OR LESS RESTRICTIVE THAN THIS
ARTICLE 12; OR
(III) THE USE OF PROPERTY THAT IS OWNED OR CONTROLLED BY A
NONPROFIT ENTITY FOR A CULTURAL, ENTERTAINMENT, ATHLETIC, OR
PATRIOTIC EVENT, SUCH AS A CONCERT, MUSIC FESTIVAL, OR FIREWORKS
DISPLAY, INCLUDING THE USE OF THE PROPERTY BY A LESSEE OF THE
NONPROFIT ENTITY OR BY A PERSON WITH WRITTEN PERMISSION FROM THE
NONPROFIT ENTITY.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (11) DOES NOT PREEMPT OR LIMIT THE
AUTHORITY OF A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION HAVING JURISDICTION TO
REGULATE NOISE ABATEMENT.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25-12-108 as
follows:
25-12-108. Preemption.
Except as provided in sections 25-12-103 (12) (11) AND (12) and
25-12-110, this article shall not be construed to ARTICLE 12 DOES NOT
preempt or limit the authority of any A municipality or county to adopt
standards that are no less restrictive than the provisions of this article THIS
ARTICLE 12.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-3- 098